testing/myv-tests.yaml
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Prl+Def.Sg: псакастсеванть
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Abe+Def.Sg: псакастсевтементь
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Abe+Def.Sg: псакастсевтементь
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Comp+Def.Sg: псакастсевтомонть
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Comp+Def.Sg: псакастсевтомонть
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Tra+Def.Sg: псакастсексэнть
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Tra+Def.Sg: псакастсексэнть
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl.Nom: псакастсетне
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl.Nom: псакастсетне
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Gen: псакастсетнень
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Gen: псакастсетнень
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Dat: псакастсетненень
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Dat: псакастсетненень
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abl: псакастсетнеде
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abl: псакастсетнеде
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ine: псакастсетнесэ
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ine: псакастсетнесэ
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ela: псакастсетнестэ
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ela: псакастсетнестэ
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ill: псакастсетнес
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ill: псакастсетнес
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra: псакастсетнева
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra: псакастсетнева
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra: псакастсетнекс
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra: псакастсетнекс
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Lat: псакастсетнев
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Lat: псакастсетнев
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abe: псакастсетневтеме
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abe: псакастсетневтеме
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Comp: псакастсетнешка
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Comp: псакастсетнешка
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Com: псакастсетненек
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Com: псакастсетненек
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Abl: псакавтомостседе
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Abl: псакавтомостседе
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Tra: псакавтомостсекс
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Tra: псакавтомостсекс
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Nom.Def.Sg: псакавтомостсесь
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Nom.Def.Sg: псакавтомостсесь
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Gen.Def.Sg: псакавтомостсенть
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Gen.Def.Sg: псакавтомостсенть
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Def.Sg.Dat: псакавтомостсентень
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Def.Sg.Dat: псакавтомостсентень
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Abl+Def.Sg: псакавтомостседенть
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Abl+Def.Sg: псакавтомостседенть
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Ine+Def.Sg: псакавтомостсесэнть
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Ine+Def.Sg: псакавтомостсесэнть
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Ela+Def.Sg: псакавтомостсестэнть
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Ela+Def.Sg: псакавтомостсестэнть
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Prl+Def.Sg: псакавтомостсеванть
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Prl+Def.Sg: псакавтомостсеванть
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Abe+Def.Sg: псакавтомостсевтементь
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Abe+Def.Sg: псакавтомостсевтементь
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Comp+Def.Sg: псакавтомостсевтомонть
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Comp+Def.Sg: псакавтомостсевтомонть
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Tra+Def.Sg: псакавтомостсексэнть
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Tra+Def.Sg: псакавтомостсексэнть
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl.Nom: псакавтомостсетне
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl.Nom: псакавтомостсетне
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Gen: псакавтомостсетнень
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Gen: псакавтомостсетнень
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Dat: псакавтомостсетненень
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Dat: псакавтомостсетненень
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abl: псакавтомостсетнеде
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abl: псакавтомостсетнеде
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ine: псакавтомостсетнесэ
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ine: псакавтомостсетнесэ
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ela: псакавтомостсетнестэ
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ela: псакавтомостсетнестэ
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ill: псакавтомостсетнес
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ill: псакавтомостсетнес
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra: псакавтомостсетнева
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra: псакавтомостсетнева
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra: псакавтомостсетнекс
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra: псакавтомостсетнекс
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Lat: псакавтомостсетнев
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Lat: псакавтомостсетнев
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abe: псакавтомостсетневтеме
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abe: псакавтомостсетневтеме
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Comp: псакавтомостсетнешка
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Comp: псакавтомостсетнешка
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Com: псакавтомостсетненек
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Com: псакавтомостсетненек
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Abl: псакашкастседе
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Abl: псакашкастседе
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Tra: псакашкастсекс
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Tra: псакашкастсекс
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Nom.Def.Sg: псакашкастсесь
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Nom.Def.Sg: псакашкастсесь
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Gen.Def.Sg: псакашкастсенть
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Gen.Def.Sg: псакашкастсенть
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Def.Sg.Dat: псакашкастсентень
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Def.Sg.Dat: псакашкастсентень
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Abl+Def.Sg: псакашкастседенть
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Abl+Def.Sg: псакашкастседенть
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Ine+Def.Sg: псакашкастсесэнть
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Ine+Def.Sg: псакашкастсесэнть
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Ela+Def.Sg: псакашкастсестэнть
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Ela+Def.Sg: псакашкастсестэнть
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Prl+Def.Sg: псакашкастсеванть
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Prl+Def.Sg: псакашкастсеванть
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Abe+Def.Sg: псакашкастсевтементь
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Abe+Def.Sg: псакашкастсевтементь
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Comp+Def.Sg: псакашкастсешканть
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Comp+Def.Sg: псакашкастсешканть
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Tra+Def.Sg: псакашкастсексэнть
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Tra+Def.Sg: псакашкастсексэнть
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl.Nom: псакашкастсетне
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl.Nom: псакашкастсетне
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Gen: псакашкастсетнень
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Gen: псакашкастсетнень
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Dat: псакашкастсетненень
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Dat: псакашкастсетненень
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abl: псакашкастсетнеде
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abl: псакашкастсетнеде
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ine: псакашкастсетнесэ
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ine: псакашкастсетнесэ
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ela: псакашкастсетнестэ
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ela: псакашкастсетнестэ
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ill: псакашкастсетнес
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ill: псакашкастсетнес
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra: псакашкастсетнева
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra: псакашкастсетнева
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra: псакашкастсетнекс
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra: псакашкастсетнекс
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Lat: псакашкастсетнев
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Lat: псакашкастсетнев
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abe: псакашкастсетневтеме
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abe: псакашкастсетневтеме
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Comp: псакашкастсетнешка
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Comp: псакашкастсетнешка
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Com: псакашкастсетненек
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Com: псакашкастсетненек
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Abl: псакасостседе
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Abl: псакасостседе
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Tra: псакасостсекс
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Tra: псакасостсекс
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Nom.Def.Sg: псакасостсесь
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Nom.Def.Sg: псакасостсесь
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Gen.Def.Sg: псакасостсенть
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Gen.Def.Sg: псакасостсенть
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Def.Sg.Dat: псакасостсентень
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Def.Sg.Dat: псакасостсентень
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Abl+Def.Sg: псакасостседенть
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Abl+Def.Sg: псакасостседенть
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Ine+Def.Sg: псакасостсесэнть
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Ine+Def.Sg: псакасостсесэнть
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Ela+Def.Sg: псакасостсестэнть
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Ela+Def.Sg: псакасостсестэнть
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Prl+Def.Sg: псакасостсеванть
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Prl+Def.Sg: псакасостсеванть
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Abe+Def.Sg: псакасостсевтементь
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Abe+Def.Sg: псакасостсевтементь
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Comp+Def.Sg: псакасостсешканть
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Comp+Def.Sg: псакасостсешканть
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Tra+Def.Sg: псакасостсексэнть
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Tra+Def.Sg: псакасостсексэнть
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl.Nom: псакасостсетне
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl.Nom: псакасостсетне
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Gen: псакасостсетнень
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Gen: псакасостсетнень
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Dat: псакасостсетненень
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Dat: псакасостсетненень
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abl: псакасостсетнеде
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abl: псакасостсетнеде
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ine: псакасостсетнесэ
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ine: псакасостсетнесэ
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ela: псакасостсетнестэ
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ela: псакасостсетнестэ
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ill: псакасостсетнес
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ill: псакасостсетнес
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra: псакасостсетнева
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra: псакасостсетнева
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra: псакасостсетнекс
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra: псакасостсетнекс
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Lat: псакасостсетнев
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Lat: псакасостсетнев
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abe: псакасостсетневтеме
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abe: псакасостсетневтеме
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Comp: псакасостсетнешка
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Comp: псакасостсетнешка
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Com: псакасостсетненек
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Com: псакасостсетненек
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Abl: псакастостседе
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Abl: псакастостседе
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px3Pl+Der/SOD+Tra: псакастостсекс
